Massachusetts, session 194th, H2189.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after Section 52E, the following section:-
Section 52F. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings:-
“Bereavement”, leave from employment taken to grieve or make arrangements
necessitated by the death of a family member.
“Family member,” the child, parent, guardian, sibling, spouse or person in a substantive
dating or engagement relationship with an employee and who resides with that employee.
(b) An employer shall permit an employee to take bereavement leave following the death
of a family member for up to 10 business days, used consecutively or non-consecutively, within
any 12 month period to:
of 3

(1) Make arrangements necessitated by the death of the family member, including, but
not limited to, funeral arrangements, estate preparation, or other legal arrangements;
(2) Attend the funeral or equivalent to a funeral of a family member; or
(3) Grieve the death of a family member.
(c) Leave permitted under this section must be initiated within 30 days of the date on
which an employee receives notice of the death of a family member.
(d) An employer shall have the sole discretion to determine whether any leave taken
under this section shall be paid or unpaid.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed so as to affect any bargaining agreement,
company policy, or other federal, state, or municipal law which provides for greater or additional
rights to leave than those provided for by this section.
(f) An employer may require documentation from an employee taking leave to deal with
the death of a family member for any of the reasons specified in subsection (b). An employee can
provide the employer any of the following documents to satisfy the request: (i) the name of the
deceased, the date of death, the city of death and the employee’s relationship to the deceased; (ii)
a copy of the deceased’s obituary or funeral program and the employee’s relationship to the
deceased; (iii) a copy of a police report involving the deceased; (iv) a copy of the death
certificate; or (v) a document issued by the mental health care provider of the employee.
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (b), an employer employing fewer than 25 employees in
the commonwealth shall not be required to comply with this section.
of 3

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 3